nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Elektronica voor motorvoertuigen > Equalizers en cross-overs voor motorvoertuigen: Actieve cross-overs; Digitale geluidsprocessors; Grafische equalizers; Parametrische equalizers; Passieve cross-overs
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車電子裝置 > 汽機車用等化器/分音器: 主動分頻器; 數位音訊處理器; 圖形等化器; 參數等化器; 被動分頻器
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Componentes eletrónicos para veículos motorizados > Crossovers e equalizadores para veículos motorizados: Crossovers ativos; Processadores de som digital; Equalizadores gráficos; Equalizadores paramétricos; Crossovers passivos
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Elektronik Sistemleri > Motorlu Araç Ekolayzırları ve Crossover'ları: Aktif Geçişler; Dijital Ses İşlemcileri; Grafik Ekolayzerler; Parametrik Ekolayzerler; Pasif Geçişler
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Elektronik > Equalizer & Frequenzweichen für Autos: Aktive Frequenzweichen; Digitale Soundprozessoren; Grafische Equalizer; Parametrische Equalizer; Passive Frequenzweichen
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Wyposażenie elektroniczne pojazdów silnikowych > Korektory i zwrotnice: Zwrotnice aktywne; Cyfrowe procesory dźwięku; Korektory graficzne; Korektory parametrów; Zwrotnice pasywne
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonselektronik > Equalizers och crossovers för motorfordon: Aktiva delningsfilter; Digitala ljudprocessorer; Grafiska equalizers; Parametriska equalizers; Passiva delningsfilter
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøyelektronikk > Equalizere og crossovere til kjøretøy: Aktive crossovere; Digitale lydprosessorer; Grafiske equalizere; Parametriske equalizere; Passive crossovere
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Електроника за моторни превозни средства > Еквалайзери и кросоувъри за моторни превозни средства: Активни кросоувъри; Цифрови звукови процесори; Графични еквалайзери; Параметрични еквалайзери; Пасивни кросоувъри
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Thiết bị điện tử xe cơ giới > Bộ bù và lọc tần số âm thanh xe cơ giới: Bộ phân tần chủ động; Bộ xử lý âm thanh kỹ thuật số; Bộ cân bằng đồ họa; Bộ cân bằng thông số; Bộ phân tần thụ động
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ηλεκτρονικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Ισοσταθμιστές & φίλτρα διαχωρισμού μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων: Ενεργά φίλτρα διαχωρισμού; Ψηφιακοί επεξεργαστές ήχου; Γραφικοί ισοσταθμιστές; Παραμετρικοί ισοσταθμιστές; Παθητικές φίλτρα διαχωρισμού
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильная электроника > Автомобильные эквалайзеры и кроссоверы: Активные кроссоверы; Устройства цифровой обработки звука; Графические эквалайзеры; Параметрические эквалайзеры; Пассивные кроссоверы
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Material electrónico para vehículos motorizados > Crossovers y ecualizadores para coches: Crossovers activos; Procesadores digitales de sonido; Ecualizadores gráficos; Ecualizadores paramétricos; Crossovers pasivos
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Électronique pour véhicules > Égaliseurs et répartiteurs pour véhicules: Répartiteurs actifs; Processeurs de son numériques; Égaliseurs graphiques; Égaliseurs paramétriques; Répartiteurs passifs
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车电子产品 > 车载音响均衡器: 主动分频器; 数字声音处理器; 图形均衡器; 参数均衡器; 被动分频器
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Elektronik til motorkøretøjer > Equalizere og crossovere til motorkøretøjer: Aktive crossovere; Digitale lydprocessorer; Grafikequalizere; Parametriske equalizere; Passive crossovere
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Eletrônicos para veículos motorizados > Equalizadores e crossovers para veículos motorizados: Crossovers ativos; Processadores de som digital; Equalizadores gráficos; Equalizadores paramétricos; Crossovers passivos
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Izenačevalniki in delilniki za motorna vozila: Aktivni delilniki; Digitalni zvočni pretvorniki; Izenačevalniki zvoka; Parametrični izenačevalniki; Pasivni delilniki
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Elektronika motorových vozidiel > Ekvalizéry a crossovery pre motorové vozidlá: Aktívne crossovery; Digitálne zvukové procesory; Grafické ekvalizéry; Parametrické ekvalizéry; Pasívne crossovery
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių elektronika > Motorinių transporto priemonių glodintuvai ir krosoveriai: Aktyvieji krosoveriai; Skaitmeniniai garso procesoriai; Grafiniai glodintuvai; Parametriniai glodintuvai; Pasyvieji krosoveriai
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Elettronica per veicoli a motore > Equalizzatori e crossover per veicoli: Crossover attivi; Processori audio digitali; Equalizzatori grafici; Equalizzatori parametrici; Crossover passivi
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjármű-elektronika > Gépjármű-kiegyenlítők és keresztváltók: Aktív keresztváltók; Digitális hangfeldolgozók; Grafikus hangszínszabályzók; Paraméteres hangszínszabályzók; Passzív keresztváltók
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen elektroniikka > Moottoriajoneuvojen taajuusmuuntimet ja jakosuodattimet: Aktiiviset jakosuodattimet; Digitaaliset ääniprosessorit; Graafiset taajuusmuuntimet; Parametriset taajuusmuuntimet; Passiiviset jakosuodattimet
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 전자 장치 > 자동차 이퀄라이저/크로스오버: 액티브 크로스오버; 디지털 사운드 프로세서; 그래픽 이퀄라이저; 파라메트릭 이퀄라이저; 패시브 크로스오버
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > วงจรอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ในรถยนต์ > อีควอไลเซอร์และครอสโอเวอร์ของรถยนต์: ครอสโอเวอร์แบบแอคทีฟ; เครื่องประมวลเสียงแบบดิจิตอล; อีควอไลเซอร์กราฟิก; อีควอไลเซอร์พาราเมตริก; ครอสโอเวอร์แบบพาสซีฟ
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Ekvilajzeri i crossoveri za motorna vozila: Aktivni crossoveri; Digitalni procesori zvuka; Grafički ekvalizatori; Parametarski ekvalizatori; Pasivni crossoveri
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Componente electronice pentru autovehicule > Egalizatoare și instalații crossover pentru autovehicule: Crossover activ; Procesoare digitale de sunet; Egalizatoare grafice; Egalizatoare parametrice; Crossover pasiv
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Electronics > Motor Vehicle Equalizers & Crossovers: Active Crossovers; Digital Sound Processors; Graphic Equalizers; Parametric Equalizers; Passive Crossovers
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Elektronika vozidel > Ekvalizéry a výhybky do vozidel: Aktivní výhybky; Digitální zvukové procesory; Grafické ekvalizéry; Parametrické ekvalizéry; Pasivní výhybky
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 車載用電子機器 > 車載用イコライザー・クロスオーバー: アクティブクロスオーバー; デジタルサウンドプロセッサ; グラフィックイコライザー; パラメトリックイコライザー; パッシブクロスオーバー